California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74108.

The director may require that any contract in which the commission is a party be submitted to him or her for concurrence prior to the commission entering into the contract. If the director requires the submission of a contract and does not concur in that contract, he or she shall hold a public hearing within 14 days of the initial decision not to concur. In the notice of the hearing, the director shall present a written explanation of his or her decision. The director shall make a final decision on whether or not to concur in the contract within 30 days of the hearing. The contract may not be executed from the time that the director makes the initial decision not to concur to the time of the final decision.

(History: Repealed (as added by Ch. 1286) and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [74121. - 74131.]

74121.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum, shall not become operative until the director finds, in a referendum conducted by him or her, or a person designated by the director, that a favorable vote has been given pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74122.

The referendum shall provide for eligible producers and eligible vintners to approve this chapter jointly as applicable to both producers and vintners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74123.

(a) Not later than April 1, 1987, the director shall establish a list of producers and a list of vintners who are eligible to vote on implementation of this chapter. In establishing the lists, the director may require producers, vintners, county agricultural commissioners, and others to submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers and vintners. The director also may require that the information provided include the quantity of winegrapes sold to vintners and the quantity of winegrapes processed by vintners or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum. The request for this information shall be in writing. The information required by the director shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

(b) Any producer or vintner whose name does not appear on the director’s lists may have his or her name included on the appropriate list by filing with the director a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer or vintner. Failure to be on the appropriate list does not exempt any producer or vintner from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74124.

In determining whether this chapter is approved by producers, the director must find that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the director participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74125.

In determining whether this chapter is approved by vintners, the director must find that at least 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the list established by the director participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting either acquired or processed their own production, or a combination thereof, which represents a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting either acquired or processed their own production, or a combination thereof, which represents 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74126.

The director shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the director may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74127.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74128.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this chapter, he or she shall certify and declare this chapter inoperative. If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this chapter, he or she shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all producers and vintners whose names and addresses may be on file with the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74129.

Upon certification of the commission, the producer and vintner members and their alternate members who are then serving on the California Wine and Winegrape Improvement Program made effective by the director on August 21, 1984, shall become the initial members and alternate members of the commission and shall serve in accordance with the requirements of Section 74071.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74130.

Subsequent to the action taken pursuant to Section 74129, persons to be elected to the commission upon expiration of existing terms shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74131.

(a) Prior to the implementation referendum conducted by the director, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the director the amount that the director deems necessary to defray the expenses in creating the commission, including, but not limited to, preparing the necessary producer and vintner lists and conducting the referendum.

(b) Any funds remaining after paying expenses shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the director.

(c) The commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the director which were used in carrying out this article and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [74151. - 74157.]

74151.

(a) Prior to the beginning of each marketing season or as soon thereafter as possible, the commission shall establish an assessment rate for the marketing season.

(b) The assessment rate shall be the same for producers and vintners. The assessment rate for producers shall not exceed 1 percent of the gross dollar value of winegrapes marketed by producers to vintners. The assessment rate for vintners shall not exceed 1 percent of the gross dollar value of winegrapes acquired by vintners from producers. If a producer sells winegrapes for a specified sum in a bona fide sale, the gross dollar amount of this sum is the gross dollar value of the winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74152.

Any producer, or producer who is also a vintner, who contracts or otherwise arranges for the processing of his or her winegrapes and retains ownership of the processed product during the marketing season shall pay the producer assessment and the vintner assessment. The “weighted average producer returns per ton” by district as published in the most recent Final Grape Crush Report issued annually for the current marketing season by the department shall be used as the basis for determining product gross dollar value and the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74153.

This chapter shall not apply to winegrapes produced only for a producer’s home use or processed only for a vintner’s home use. However, any producer or vintner claiming this exemption shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing the manner in which the winegrapes are used. The commission shall then determine whether the affidavit should be approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74154.

Every producer and vintner subject to this chapter shall keep a complete and accurate record of their operations. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be preserved by producers and vintners for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74155.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the director from producers or vintners, and all lists of producers and vintners in the possession of the commission or the director are confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding. Information on volume shipments, commodity value, and other related information which is required for reports to governmental agencies; financial reports made to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information; and any other information which is requested from the commission excluding individual producer or vintner information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74156.

Any assessment levied by the commission, pursuant to this chapter, is a personal debt of every person so assessed and is due and payable in a time and manner prescribed by the commission. Failure of a vintner to collect the assessment from a producer shall not exempt the vintner from liability nor relieve the producer of the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74157.

Any person who fails to file a return, or remit or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [74171. - 74174.]

74171.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the marketing, processing, or other activities related to wine or winegrapes, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the name and address of the persons to whom winegrapes were delivered or from whom winegrapes have been received, and the quantity so delivered or received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be maintained under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74172.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its acts or determinations an informal hearing. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the director. The determination of the director shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court. Pending disposition of any appeal and judicial review, the parties shall abide by the acts or determinations of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74173.

(a) The commission may commence civil action and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable verdict for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74174.

Suspension or termination of this chapter in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 74191) shall not result in any of the following:

(a) Affecting, waiving, or termination of any right, duty, obligation, or liability which may have arisen or may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter.

(b) Releasing, condoning, or dismissal of any violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [74191. - 74196.]

74191.

Between July 1, 1991, and June 30, 1992, inclusive, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among producers and vintners in the manner specified in Section 74122 to determine whether this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect. A favorable vote shall be found if the director determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible producers, or vintners, or both, who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operations of this chapter. If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given to continue a joint producer-vintner commission, a producer commission, or a vintner commission, he or she shall so certify and this chapter or the appropriate portions thereof shall remain in effect. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operations of this chapter suspended upon expiration of the marketing season. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74192.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to June 30, 1992, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter unless a referendum is conducted as a result of a petition pursuant to this article. In that case, the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum following procedures provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74193.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season. 

(b) Alternatively, the director may be petitioned to suspend this chapter. The petition must be signed by 20 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 20 percent of the volume of winegrapes in the immediately preceding marketing season and 20 percent of the vintners by number who acquired not less than 20 percent of the volume of winegrapes in the immediately preceding marketing season. The director shall hold a hearing on the petition after receiving it.

(c) The director shall, upon receipt of the recommendation to suspend this chapter from the commission, or may, after holding the hearing on the petition to suspend this chapter, hold a referendum among the producers and vintners to determine if the commission shall be suspended. However, the director shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(d) The director shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The director may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the referendum period, the director shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers and 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the lists established by the director participate in the referendum, the director shall suspend this chapter if he or she finds either of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers and vintners who voted in the referendum, voted in favor of suspension; the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of winegrapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who participated in the referendum; and the vintners so voting acquired a majority of the total quantity of winegrapes acquired in the preceding marketing season by all of the vintners who participated in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers and vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension; the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of winegrapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum; and the vintners so voting acquired 65 percent or more of the total quantity of winegrapes acquired in the preceding marketing season by all of the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74194.

(a) The director shall terminate the commission at the end of the current marketing season if the director finds that termination is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that are directly affected that market at least 51 percent of the volume of the product, and by at least 51 percent of the eligible vintners that are directly affected that acquire at least 51 percent of the volume of the product.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the director in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the director.

(c) The signatures to the petition requesting termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add his or her signature and business address. If no business address is given, a designation of the place of business shall be given which will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74195.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the commission shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any funds shall be paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, another state agency, or a federal agency which deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74196.

Upon suspension of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and vintners affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. California Wine Commission [74501. - 74696.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [74501. - 74508.]

74501.

The production and distribution of wine and wine-related products constitute an important industry of this state which provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens. It also furnishes an important food which benefits the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74502.

The maintenance and expansion of the wine industry of California and of its local, national, and foreign markets is necessary to assure the consuming public of a continuous supply of these products and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those engaged in the wine industry in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74503.

It is in the public interest that the public be made aware of accurate and scientific information relating to the beneficial qualities of wine and wine-related products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74504.

The production and marketing of wine and wine-related products produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74505.

No action taken by the commission or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under the chapter is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Fair Trade Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16900) of that Part 2), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade. Proof that any action complained of was done in compliance with this chapter shall be a complete defense to the action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74506.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74507.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry, and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that with respect to persons who serve on the commission, the particular agricultural industry is tantamount to, and constitutes the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74508.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of market development, marketing research, and production and processing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [74521. - 74539.]

74521.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74522.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74523.

“Brandy” means an alcoholic distillate or a mixture of distillates obtained from the fermented juice, mash, or wine of whole, sound, ripe grapes or from the residue thereof, distilled at not over 170 degrees proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74524.

“Commission” means the California Wine Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74524.1.

“Director” means the Director of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74524.5.

“Eligible volume” means the total tonnage of winegrapes processed in the preceding marketing season by vintners subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74525.

“Grape concentrate” or “concentrate” means unfermented grape juice from which the major portion of the original water content has been removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74526.

“Grape juice” or “juice” means unfermented crushed grapes without solids containing the major portion of the original water content.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74527.

“Producer” and “grower” are synonymous and mean any person who produced winegrapes in the preceding marketing season. Producer also includes any person who receives winegrapes as payment for the use of his or her property in the production of winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74528.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74529.

“High proof” means an alcoholic distillate or a mixture of distillates obtained from the fermented juice, mash, or wine of fresh winegrapes or from the residue thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74530.

“Market” means to sell, barter, trade, purchase, acquire, or otherwise distribute wine or wine-related products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74531.

“Market development” includes, but is not limited to, trade promotion, public information, dissemination of information on health and social issues and other matters, and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which restrict the free flow of wine and wine-related products to market and may include the presentation of facts to state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74532.

“Market research” means any investigation, development, analysis, or implementation of information relating to the marketing of wine and wine-related products, including, but not limited to, trade practices, consumer trends, promotion, sales, and advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74533.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning July 1 of any year and extending through June 30 of the following years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74534.

“Must” means a mixture of unfermented crushed grapes, solid grape particles, and grape juice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74535.

“Processing research” means research relating to the processing of winegrapes, including, but not limited to, the development of new wine-related products and uses for these products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74536.

“Vintner” means a winegrower, as defined in Section 23013 of the Business and Professions Code, who holds a winegrower’s license issued by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23300) of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code, and who is engaged in producing must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including high proof and brandy by processing winegrapes or field crushed must. A vintner who processes winegrapes in the preceding marketing season in a quantity of 100 tons or less is not subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 1.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74537.

“Wine” means the product obtained by the fermentation of winegrapes or juice therefrom, with or without addition or abstracting, and includes any product made from winegrapes which is defined as a wine and permitted under Part III (commencing with Section 5381) of Subchapter F of Chapter 51 of Title 26 of the United States Code, and in the statutes of this state and regulations issued thereunder defining wine produced from grapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74538.

“Winegrapes” means grapes produced in this state which are intended to be converted from their fresh form into grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including, but not limited to, high proof and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74539.

“Wine-related products” include, but are not limited to, must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, high proof, and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Wine Commission [74561. - 74576.]

74561.

(a) There is in state government, the California Wine Commission. The commission shall be composed of 18 vintners and may include one public member. 

(b) Vintner members shall be elected by the industry at large and serve on the commission without reference to any county, district, or area of the state.

(c) The public member may be appointed to the commission by the director from nominees recommended by the commission.

(d) The director, and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74562.

(a) The director may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function which is determined by the director not to be in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make these corrections as required by the director, the director may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the director has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The director, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the director shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74563.

The commission or the director may bring an action for judicial relief from the director’s written notice or for noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74564.

When the director is required to concur in a decision of the commission, he or she shall indicate his or her response to the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision. The response may be a request that additional information be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74565.

The commission shall reimburse the director for all expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the director’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74566.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member of whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission and have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate shall serve as a member on the commission until a successor is elected and has qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74567.

Any vintner member and his or her alternate member shall be a person, or an employee representing a vintner, who has a financial interest in processing winegrapes for market. The qualifications of vintner members and alternate members shall be maintained during the entire term of office. Not more than one member and his or her alternate member shall be employed by or connected in a proprietary capacity with the same vintner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74568.

The public member and his or her alternate member shall have all the rights, privileges, and powers of any other member of the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the wine or winegrape industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74569.

The term of office of members and alternate members shall be for two years or until their successors have been elected and have qualified. However, of the first members of the commission, one-half of the vintner members and their alternate members shall serve for one year; and one-half of the vintner members and their alternate members shall serve for two years. The determination of the term of each member shall be made by lot. No member or alternate member shall serve more than four consecutive terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74570.

No less than 10 vintner members, including alternate members when acting in place of the members, shall constitute a quorum of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74571.

The vote of a majority of the members, or alternate members when acting in the place of the members, present at the meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74572.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74573.

The director or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend meetings of the commission and any committee meetings of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74574.
